de: Form des Boilies: Fass; Zylinder; Hantel; Kissen; Rund; Quadratisch; Sonstige
sl-SI: Oblika boljijev: Sodček; Valj; Utež; Blazinica; Okrogla; Kvadratna; Drugo
es: Forma del cebo boilie: Barril; Cilindro; Mancuerna; Almohada; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otro
fr: Forme des bouillettes: Tonneau; Cylindre; Haltère; Coussin; Rond; Carré; Autre
hu: Bojli alakja: Hordó; Henger; Súlyzó; Párna; Kerek; Szögletes; Egyéb
da: Form på boilie: Tønde; Cylinder; Dumbbell; Pude; Rund; Firkantet; Andet
nl: Boilie vorm: Tonnetje; Cilinder; Halter; Kussentje; Rond; Vierkant; Overige
pt-BR: Formato da boilie: Barril; Cilindro; Haltere; Almofada; Redondo; Quadrado; Outros
ja: ボイリーのShapes: バレル; シリンダー; ダンベル; ピロー; ラウンド; スクエア; その他
tr: Boilie şekli: Fıçı; Silindir; Dambıl; Yastık; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
it: Shapesdi boilies: A barile; A cilindro; A manubrio; A cuscino; Rotonda; Quadrata; Altro
pt-PT: Forma dos boilies: Barris; Cilindro; Haltere; Almofada; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
ro-RO: Formă boilie: Butoi; Cilindru; Dumbbell; Pernă; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
lt-LT: Boilio forma: Statinės formos; Cilindro formos; Svarmens formos; Pagalvėlės formos; Apvali; Kvadratinė; Kita
fi: Boilie-stopparin muoto: Tynnyri; Sylinteri; Käsipaino; Tyyny; Pyöreä; Neliö; Muu
zh-TW: 波麗餌形狀: 桶狀; 圓柱體; 啞鈴狀; 枕狀; 圓形; 方形; 其他
pl: Kształt kulek proteinowych: Beczka; Walec; Dumbells; Poduszka; Okrągłe; Kwadrat; Inne
zh-CN: 丸饵形状: 桶形; 圆柱形; 哑铃形; 枕形; 圆形; 方形; 其他
nb: Boilie-former: Tønne; Sylinder; Manual; Pute; Rund; Firkantet; Annet
bg-BG: Форма на бойлито: Варелче; Цилиндър; Дъмбел; Възглавничка; Кръгла; Квадратна; Друго
hr-HR: Oblici boila: Bačvica; Valjak; Bučica; Jastučić; Okrugle; Kvadratne; Ostalo
ru: Форма бойлов: Бочонок; Цилиндр; Гантель; Подушечка; Круглый; Квадратный; Другое
vi: Hình dạng mồi câu: Hình thùng; Hình trụ; Hình tạ đơn; Hình gối; Tròn; Vuông; Khác
sk-SK: Tvar zarážky návnady: Súdok; Valec; Činka; Vankúšik; Okrúhle; Štvorcové; Iné
el: Σχήμα Boilie: Βαρέλι; Κύλινδρος; Αλτήρας; Μαξιλαράκι; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
th: รูปทรงของเหยื่อโบอีลี่: ทรงถัง; ทรงกระบอก; ทรงดัมเบล; ทรงหมอน; ทรงกลม; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
sv: Boilie-former: Tunna; Cylinder; Hantel; Kudde; Rund; Kvadratisk; Annan
en: Boilie shape: Barrel; Cylinder; Dumbbell; Pillow; Round; Square; Other
ko: 보일리 모양: 원통형; 실린더형; 덤벨형; 필로우형; 원형; 사각형; 기타
cs: Tvar boilies: Soudek; Válec; Činka; Polštářek; Kulaté; Čtverec; Jiné